Idaho, session 2025, S1053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 35-104, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
35-104. CARE OF FENCES BY ADJOINING OWNERS -- FENCES BORDERING FED-
ERAL LAND. (1) Each adjoining land owner, unless both otherwise agree, or
unless other arrangements have heretofore been made, must construct and
keep in repair that half of the line fence between their respective tracts
of land that is to his left when he is standing on his own land facing the
other; unless the owner of one (1) of said tracts chooses to allow his land
to be uninclosed unenclosed: provided, that one (1) party may, for his own
convenience, strengthen, or render hog-tight, the whole or any part of said
fence by stretching one (1) or more additional wires thereon or otherwise;
in which event the other shall not be liable for his proportion of the ad-
ditional cost. Provided further, if one (1) of the parties shall render
such fence hog-tight and the other shall at any time use his field for the
pasture of hogs, sheep or goats, without a herder, such other shall become
liable as a joint user or owner and shall, upon demand of the party building
the hog-tight fence, pay his just proportion thereof. In case viewers are
appointed, as provided in section 35-106, Idaho Code, the report of such
viewers must be in conformity with this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section,
any landowner who intends to prevent livestock on adjacent federally managed
land from entering his private property shall be solely responsible to erect
and maintain a lawful fence on the property line.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.